Massachusetts, session 194th, H2627.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Part 1   ADMINISTRATION OF THE GOVERNMENT 
Title VI  COUNTIES AND COUNTY OFFICERS 
SECTION 17. Chapter 37 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
existing text in Section 17 the following: 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, The Correction Officers and 
Jail Officers working in the fourteen (14) County Sheriffs' Offices throughout the 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall re‐titled Correction Officer I, II and III or Jail Officer I, 
II, and III, and be paid base salaries according to the corresponding salary Grade in State 

of 2 9 Bargaining Unit 4 covering the Department of Correction job titles of Correction Officer I, II, or 
III. County Sheriffs’ Office, Correction Officers and Jail Officers shall be slotted into such Unit 
4 titles according to where the core duties and responsibilities of such Correction Officers and 
Jail Officers within the County Sheriffs’ Offices most closely approximate the core duties and 
responsibilities of the corresponding Department of Correction CO I, II, and III titles. The 
foregoing compensation adjustment shall be structured so that the salary rates for Sheriffs' Office 
Correction Officer I, II, III and Jail Officer I, II, III equalize with the general Department of 
Corrections base salary rates in through equal annual increments over the three fiscal years after 
next following the passage of this legislation by the General Court and its enactment by the 
Governor. Upon the enactment of this legislation, County Sheriffs will not be required to bargain 
under G. L. Chapter 150E with public employee organizations representing County Sheriffs 
Correction Officers I, II and III or Jail Officers I, II and III over base salary rates for such 
Officers covering the three fiscal year period in which such Officers are receiving salary rates 
pursuant to this legislation, but shall otherwise remain obligated to comply with collective 
bargaining agreements, if any, covering such Officers and, in all other respects, except as 
otherwise provided herein, shall remain obligated to comply with their obligations under Chapter 
150E with respect to such Officers and the public employee labor organizations representing 
such Officers during such three fiscal year period. Following the three fiscal year period covered 
by this legislation, Chapter 150E shall once again fully apply to County Sheriffs as it relates to 
Correction Officers I, II, and III and Jail Officers I, II and III in all respects, including but not 
limited to the negotiation of base salary rates with public employee organizations representing 
them.